Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB808.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5551 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5551. No limitation applicable.(a) No limit.--A prosecution for the following offenses may be commenced at any time:(1) Murder.(2) Voluntary manslaughter.(3) Conspiracy to commit murder or solicitation to commit murder if a murder results from the conspiracy or solicitation.(4) Any felony alleged to have been perpetrated in connection with a murder of the first or second degree, as set forth in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) or (b) and (d) (relating to 123456789101112131415161718 murder).(5) A violation of 75 Pa.C.S. § 3742 (relating to accidents involving death or personal injury) or 3732 (relating to homicide by vehicle) if the accused was the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the death of any person.(6) A violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1), (2), (4) or (7) (relating to aggravated assault) if the accused knew the victim was a law enforcement officer and the law enforcement officer was acting within the scope of the officer's duties.(7) An offense under any of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses), or a conspiracy or solicitation to commit an offense under any of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. if the offense results from the conspiracy or solicitation, if the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the offense:Section 3011(b) (relating to trafficking in individuals).Section 3012 (relating to involuntary servitude) as it relates to sexual servitude.Section 3121 (relating to rape).Section 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault).Section 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).Section 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).Section 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault).Section 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).20250HB0808PN0838 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4302 (relating to incest).(8) An offense under any of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S., or a conspiracy or solicitation to commit an offense under any of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. if the offense results from the conspiracy or solicitation, if the victim is a nonverbal care-dependent person at the time of the offense:Section 2701 (relating to simple assault).Section 2702.Section 2713 (relating to neg lect of care-dependent person).Section 2713.1 (relating to abuse of care-dependent person).Section 2718 (relating to strangulation).Section 3121.Section 3122.1.Section 3123.Section 3124.1.Section 3124.2.Section 3125.Section 3126 (relating to indecent assault).(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "nonverbal care-dependent person" shall mean an individual who is 18 years of age or older who, due to physical or cognitive disability or impairment, requires assistance to meet the individual's needs for food, shelter, clothing, personal care or health care and has significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning that is accompanied by significant limitations in the adaptive function of communication.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0808PN0838 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930